incubator/apertium-sme-smj.sme.dix
    <pardef n="Su/orta__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ortan</l>
          <r>orta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orttain</l>
          <r>orta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rtii</l>
          <r>orta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orta</l>
          <r>orta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ortta</l>
          <r>orta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ortta</l>
          <r>orta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orttas</l>
          <r>orta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orttaiguin</l>
          <r>orta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orttaide</l>
          <r>orta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orttat</l>
          <r>orta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orttaid</l>
          <r>orta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orttaid</l>
          <r>orta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orttain</l>
          <r>orta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Áhgu/oika__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oikan</l>
          <r>oika<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oikkain</l>
          <r>oika<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ikii</l>
          <r>oika<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oika</l>
          <r>oika<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oikka</l>
          <r>oika<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oikka</l>
          <r>oika<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oikkas</l>
          <r>oika<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oikkaiguin</l>
          <r>oika<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oikkaide</l>
          <r>oika<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oikkat</l>
          <r>oika<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oikkaid</l>
          <r>oika<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oikkaid</l>
          <r>oika<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oikkain</l>
          <r>oika<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Gaskame/arra__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arran</l>
          <r>arra<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arain</l>
          <r>arra<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rrii</l>
          <r>arra<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arra</l>
          <r>arra<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ara</l>
          <r>arra<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ara</l>
          <r>arra<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aras</l>
          <r>arra<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>araiguin</l>
          <r>arra<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>araide</l>
          <r>arra<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arat</l>
          <r>arra<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>araid</l>
          <r>arra<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>araid</l>
          <r>arra<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arain</l>
          <r>arra<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ájogá/ddi__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddin</l>
          <r>ddi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttiin</l>
          <r>ddi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddái</l>
          <r>ddi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddi</l>
          <r>ddi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tti</l>
          <r>ddi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tti</l>
          <r>ddi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttis</l>
          <r>ddi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttiiguin</l>
          <r>ddi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttiide</l>
          <r>ddi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttit</l>
          <r>ddi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttiid</l>
          <r>ddi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttiid</l>
          <r>ddi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttiin</l>
          <r>ddi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Áhguoika"><i>Áhgu</i><par n="Áhgu/oika__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ájogáddi"><i>Ájogá</i><par n="Ájogá/ddi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Áiteguoika"><i>Áitegu</i><par n="Áhgu/oika__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Gálgoguoika"><i>Gálgogu</i><par n="Áhgu/oika__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Gaskamearra"><i>Gaskame</i><par n="Gaskame/arra__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Hålogaláddi"><i>Hålogalá</i><par n="Ájogá/ddi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Jávregáddi"><i>Jávregá</i><par n="Ájogá/ddi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Jiekŋamearra"><i>Jiekŋame</i><par n="Gaskame/arra__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Justislávdegoddi"><i>Justislávdego</i><par n="Ájogá/ddi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Justiisalávdegoddi"><i>Justiisalávdego</i><par n="Ájogá/ddi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Máttaráhkoguoika"><i>Máttaráhkogu</i><par n="Áhgu/oika__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Nuortamearra"><i>Nuortame</i><par n="Gaskame/arra__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Barentsmearra"><i>Barentsme</i><par n="Gaskame/arra__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Bávttaguoika"><i>Bávttagu</i><par n="Áhgu/oika__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Barentsčállingoddi"><i>Barentsčállingo</i><par n="Ájogá/ddi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Reamaguoika"><i>Reamagu</i><par n="Áhgu/oika__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Sámevuoigatvuođalávdegoddi"><i>Sámevuoigatvuođalávdego</i><par n="Ájogá/ddi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Suorta"><i>Su</i><par n="Su/orta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Strukturlávdegoddi"><i>Strukturlávdego</i><par n="Ájogá/ddi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Vilgesmearra"><i>Vilgesme</i><par n="Gaskame/arra__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Vuovdaguoika"><i>Vuovdagu</i><par n="Áhgu/oika__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Yanaeatnogáddi"><i>Yanaeatnogá</i><par n="Ájogá/ddi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Botnjeguoika"><i>Botnjegu</i><par n="Áhgu/oika__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Čáhppesmearra"><i>Čáhppesme</i><par n="Gaskame/arra__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Dápmotguoika"><i>Dápmotgu</i><par n="Áhgu/oika__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Davvemearra"><i>Davveme</i><par n="Gaskame/arra__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Davvimearra"><i>Davvime</i><par n="Gaskame/arra__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Čulloveiguoika"><i>Čulloveigu</i><par n="Áhgu/oika__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Deatnogáddi"><i>Deatnogá</i><par n="Ájogá/ddi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Duškánguoika"><i>Duškángu</i><par n="Áhgu/oika__N_Prop"/></e>
